Utah statutes.
62A-4a-404.   Fetal alcohol syndrome and drug dependency -- Reporting requirements.

When an individual, including a licensee under the Medical Practice Act or the Nurse Practice Act, attends the birth of a child or cares for a child, and determines that the child, at the time of birth, has fetal alcohol syndrome, fetal alcohol spectrum disorder, or fetal drug dependency, the individual shall report that determination to the division as soon as possible.

